North Carolina statutes. Chapter 150B. Administrative Procedure Act.
Article 2A. Rules.
§ 150B-21.4.
Fiscal and regulatory impact analysis on rules.

State Funds. — Before an agency publishes in the North Carolina Register the proposed text of a permanent rule change that would require the expenditure or distribution of funds subject to the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the General Statutes, it must submit the text of the proposed rule change, an analysis of the proposed rule change, and a fiscal note on the proposed rule change to the Office of State Budget and Management and obtain certification from the Office of State Budget and Management that the funds that would be required by the proposed rule change are available. The fiscal note must state the amount of funds that would be expended or distributed as a result of the proposed rule change and explain how the amount was computed. The Office of State Budget and Management must certify a proposed rule change if funds are available to cover the expenditure or distribution required by the proposed rule change.

(a1)

DOT Analyses. —

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, any agency that adopts a rule affecting environmental permitting of Department of Transportation projects shall conduct an analysis to determine if the rule will result in an increased cost to the Department of Transportation. The analysis shall be conducted and submitted to the Board of Transportation when the agency submits the notice of text for publication. The agency shall consider any recommendations offered by the Board of Transportation prior to adopting the rule. Once a rule subject to this subsection is adopted, the Board of Transportation may submit any objection to the rule it may have to the Rules Review Commission. If the Rules Review Commission receives an objection to a rule from the Board of Transportation no later than 5:00 P.M. of the day following the day the Commission approves the rule, then the rule shall only become effective as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b1).

Local Funds. — Before an agency publishes in the North Carolina Register the proposed text of a permanent rule change that would affect the expenditures or revenues of a unit of local government, it must submit the text of the proposed rule change and a fiscal note on the proposed rule change to the Office of State Budget and Management as provided by

G.S. 150B-21.26

, the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly, the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, and the North Carolina League of Municipalities. The fiscal note must state the amount by which the proposed rule change would increase or decrease expenditures or revenues of a unit of local government and must explain how the amount was computed.

(b1)

Substantial Economic Impact. —

Before an agency publishes in the North Carolina Register the proposed text of a permanent rule change that would have a substantial economic impact and that is not identical to a federal regulation that the agency is required to adopt, the agency shall prepare a fiscal note for the proposed rule change and have the note approved by the Office of State Budget and Management. The agency must also obtain from the Office a certification that the agency adhered to the regulatory principles set forth in G.S. 150B-19.1(a)(2), (5), and (6). The agency may request the Office of State Budget and Management to prepare the fiscal note only after, working with the Office, it has exhausted all resources, internal and external, to otherwise prepare the required fiscal note. If an agency requests the Office of State Budget and Management to prepare a fiscal note for a proposed rule change, that Office must prepare the note within 90 days after receiving a written request for the note. If the Office of State Budget and Management fails to prepare a fiscal note within this time period, the agency proposing the rule change shall prepare a fiscal note. A fiscal note prepared in this circumstance does not require approval of the Office of State Budget and Management.If an agency prepares the required fiscal note, the agency must submit the note to the Office of State Budget and Management for review. The Office of State Budget and Management shall review the fiscal note within 14 days after it is submitted and either approve the note or inform the agency in writing of the reasons why it does not approve the fiscal note. After addressing these reasons, the agency may submit the revised fiscal note to that Office for its review. If an agency is not sure whether a proposed rule change would have a substantial economic impact, the agency shall ask the Office of State Budget and Management to determine whether the proposed rule change has a substantial economic impact. Failure to prepare or obtain approval of the fiscal note as required by this subsection shall be a basis for objection to the rule under G.S. 150B-21.9(a)(4).As used in this subsection, the term “substantial economic impact” means an aggregate financial impact on all persons affected of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) in a 12-month period. In analyzing substantial economic impact, an agency shall do the following:

Determine and identify the appropriate time frame of the analysis.

Assess the baseline conditions against which the proposed rule is to be measured.

Describe the persons who would be subject to the proposed rule and the type of expenditures these persons would be required to make.

Estimate any additional costs that would be created by implementation of the proposed rule by measuring the incremental difference between the baseline and the future condition expected after implementation of the rule. The analysis should include direct costs as well as opportunity costs. Cost estimates must be monetized to the greatest extent possible. Where costs are not monetized, they must be listed and described.

For costs that occur in the future, the agency shall determine the net present value of the costs by using a discount factor of seven percent (7%).

(b2)

Content. —

A fiscal note required by subsection (b1) of this section must contain the following:

(1)

A description of the persons who would be affected by the proposed rule change.

(2)

A description of the types of expenditures that persons affected by the proposed rule change would have to make to comply with the rule and an estimate of these expenditures.

(3)

A description of the purpose and benefits of the proposed rule change.

(4)

An explanation of how the estimate of expenditures was computed.

(5)

A description of at least two alternatives to the proposed rule that were considered by the agency and the reason the alternatives were rejected. The alternatives may have been identified by the agency or by members of the public.

Errors. — An erroneous fiscal note prepared in good faith does not affect the validity of a rule.

If an agency proposes the repeal of an existing rule, the agency is not required to prepare a fiscal note on the proposed rule change as provided by this section.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 41.1; 1983, c. 761, s. 185; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 54; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1995, c. 415, s. 2; c. 507, s. 27.8(b); 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2003-229, s. 6; 2005-276, s. 28.8(a); 2006-203, s. 124; 2011-398, s. 6; 2012-187, s. 4; 2013-149, s. 1; 2013-413, s. 2; 2014-115, s. 17; 2014-120, s. 6(b).

§ 150B-21.5.
Circumstances when notice and rule-making hearing not required; circumstances when submission to the Commission not required.

Amendment. — An agency is not required to publish a notice of text in the North Carolina Register, hold a public hearing, or submit the amended rule to the Commission for review when it proposes to amend a rule to do one of the following:

Reletter or renumber the rule or subparts of the rule.

Substitute one name for another when an organization or position is renamed.

Correct a citation in the rule to another rule or law when the citation has become inaccurate since the rule was adopted because of the repeal or renumbering of the cited rule or law.

Change information that is readily available to the public, such as an address, email address, a telephone number, or a Web site.

Correct a typographical error.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-140, s. 1(a), effective July 19, 2019.

(a1)

Response to Commission. —

An agency is not required to publish a notice of text in the North Carolina Register or hold a public hearing when it proposes to change the rule in response to a request or an objection by the Commission, unless the Commission determines that the change is substantial.

Repeal. — An agency is not required to publish a notice of text in the North Carolina Register or hold a public hearing when it proposes to repeal a rule as a result of any of the following:

The law under which the rule was adopted is repealed.

The law under which the rule was adopted or the rule itself is declared unconstitutional.

The rule is declared to be in excess of the agency’s statutory authority.

OSHA Standard. — The Occupational Safety and Health Division of the Department of Labor is not required to publish a notice of text in the North Carolina Register or hold a public hearing when it proposes to adopt a rule that concerns an occupational safety and health standard and is identical to a federal regulation promulgated by the Secretary of the United States Department of Labor. The Occupational Safety and Health Division is not required to submit to the Commission for review a rule for which notice and hearing is not required under this subsection.

State Building Code. — The Building Code Council is not required to publish a notice of text in the North Carolina Register when it proposes to adopt a rule that concerns the North Carolina State Building Code. The Building Code Council is required to publish a notice in the North Carolina Register when it proposes to adopt a rule that concerns the North Carolina State Building Code. The notice must include all of the following:

A statement of the subject matter of the proposed rule making.

A short explanation of the reason for the proposed action.

A citation to the law that gives the agency the authority to adopt a rule on the subject matter of the proposed rule making.

The person to whom questions or written comments may be submitted on the subject matter of the proposed rule making.The Building Code Council is required to submit to the Commission for review a rule for which notice of text is not required under this subsection. In adopting a rule, the Council shall comply with the procedural requirements of

G.S. 150B-21.3

.

An agency that adopts or amends a rule pursuant to subsection (a) or (c) of this section shall notify the Codifier of Rules of its actions. When notified of an agency action taken pursuant to subsection (a) or (c) of this section, the Codifier of Rules shall make the appropriate change to the North Carolina Administrative Code.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1995, c. 504, s. 12; 1997-34, s. 4; 2001-141, s. 5; 2001-421, s. 1.3; 2003-229, s. 7; 2019-140, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-140, s. 1(a), effective July 19, 2019, inserted “circumstances when submission to the Commission not required” in the catchline; rewrote subsection (a); and added subsections (a1) and (e).

§ 150B-21.6.
Incorporating material in a rule by reference.

An agency may incorporate the following material by reference in a rule without repeating the text of the referenced material:

Another rule or part of a rule adopted by the agency.

All or part of a code, standard, or regulation adopted by another agency, the federal government, or a generally recognized organization or association.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-34, s. 5.

In incorporating material by reference, the agency must designate in the rule whether or not the incorporation includes subsequent amendments and editions of the referenced material. The agency can change this designation only by a subsequent rule-making proceeding. The agency must have copies of the incorporated material available for inspection and must specify in the rule both where copies of the material can be obtained and the cost on the date the rule is adopted of a copy of the material.

A statement in a rule that a rule incorporates material by reference in accordance with former G.S. 150B-14(b) is a statement that the rule does not include subsequent amendments and editions of the referenced material. A statement in a rule that a rule incorporates material by reference in accordance with former G.S. 150B-14(c) is a statement that the rule includes subsequent amendments and editions of the referenced material.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 64; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1359, s. 5; 1983, c. 641, s. 3; c. 768, s. 19; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1987, c. 285, s. 13; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1997-34, s. 5.

§ 150B-21.7.
Effect of transfer of duties or termination of agency on rules.

When a law that authorizes an agency to adopt a rule is repealed and another law gives the same or another agency substantially the same authority to adopt a rule, the rule remains in effect until the agency with authority over the rule amends or repeals the rule. When a law that authorizes an agency to adopt a rule is repealed and another law does not give the same or another agency substantially the same authority to adopt a rule, a rule adopted under the repealed law is repealed as of the date the law is repealed. The agency that adopted the rule shall notify the Codifier of Rules that the rule is repealed pursuant to this subsection.

When an executive order abolishes part or all of an agency and transfers a function of that agency to another agency, a rule concerning the transferred function remains in effect until the agency to which the function is transferred amends or repeals the rule. When an executive order abolishes part or all of an agency and does not transfer a function of that agency to another agency, a rule concerning a function abolished by the executive order is repealed as of the effective date of the executive order. The agency that adopted the rule shall notify the Codifier of Rules that the rule is repealed pursuant to this subsection.

When notified of a rule repealed under this section, the Codifier of Rules must enter the repeal of the rule in the North Carolina Administrative Code.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 2013-143, s. 2.

Part 3. Review by Commission.

§ 150B-21.8.
Review of rule by Commission.

Emergency Rule. — The Commission does not review an emergency rule.

Temporary and Permanent Rules. — An agency must submit temporary and permanent rules adopted by it to the Commission before the rule can be included in the North Carolina Administrative Code. The Commission reviews a temporary or permanent rule in accordance with the standards in

G.S. 150B-21.9

and follows the procedure in this Part in its review of a rule.

Scope. — When the Commission reviews an amendment to a permanent rule, it may review the entire rule that is being amended. The procedure in

G.S. 150B-21.12

applies when the Commission objects to a part of a permanent rule that is within its scope of review but is not changed by a rule amendment.

Judicial Review. — When the Commission returns a permanent rule to an agency in accordance with

G.S. 150B-21.12(d)

, the agency may file an action for declaratory judgment in Wake County Superior Court pursuant to Article 26 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1; 2003-229, s. 8.

§ 150B-21.9.
Standards and timetable for review by Commission.

Standards. — The Commission must determine whether a rule meets all of the following criteria:

It is within the authority delegated to the agency by the General Assembly.

It is clear and unambiguous.

It is reasonably necessary to implement or interpret an enactment of the General Assembly, or of Congress, or a regulation of a federal agency. The Commission shall consider the cumulative effect of all rules adopted by the agency related to the specific purpose for which the rule is proposed.

It was adopted in accordance with Part 2 of this Article.The Commission shall not consider questions relating to the quality or efficacy of the rule but shall restrict its review to determination of the standards set forth in this subsection.The Commission may ask the Office of State Budget and Management to determine if a rule has a substantial economic impact and is therefore required to have a fiscal note. The Commission must ask the Office of State Budget and Management to make this determination if a fiscal note was not prepared for a rule and the Commission receives a written request for a determination of whether the rule has a substantial economic impact.

(a1)

Entry of a rule in the North Carolina Administrative Code after review by the Commission creates a rebuttable presumption that the rule was adopted in accordance with Part 2 of this Article.

Timetable. — The Commission must review a permanent rule submitted to it on or before the twentieth of a month by the last day of the next month. The Commission must review a rule submitted to it after the twentieth of a month by the last day of the second subsequent month. The Commission must review a temporary rule in accordance with the timetable and procedure set forth in

G.S. 150B-21.1

.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(f); 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2003-229, s. 9.

§ 150B-21.10.
Commission action on permanent rule.

At the first meeting at which a permanent rule is before the Commission for review, the Commission must take one of the following actions:

Approve the rule, if the Commission determines that the rule meets the standards for review.

Object to the rule, if the Commission determines that the rule does not meet the standards for review.

Extend the period for reviewing the rule, if the Commission determines it needs additional information on the rule to be able to decide whether the rule meets the standards for review.

In reviewing a new rule or an amendment to an existing rule, the Commission may request an agency to make technical changes to the rule and may condition its approval of the rule on the agency’s making the requested technical changes.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1.

§ 150B-21.11.
Procedure when Commission approves permanent rule.

When the Commission approves a permanent rule, it must notify the agency that adopted the rule of the Commission’s approval, and deliver the approved rule to the Codifier of Rules.

If the approved rule will increase or decrease expenditures or revenues of a unit of local government, the Commission must also notify the Governor of the Commission’s approval of the rule and deliver a copy of the approved rule to the Governor by the end of the month in which the Commission approved the rule.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1995, c. 415, s. 4; c. 507, s. 27.8(g); 2011-291, s. 2.59; 2011-398, s. 7; 2018-142, s. 22.

§ 150B-21.12.
Procedure when Commission objects to a permanent rule.

Action. — When the Commission objects to a permanent rule, it must send the agency that adopted the rule a written statement of the objection and the reason for the objection. The agency that adopted the rule must take one of the following actions:

Change the rule to satisfy the Commission’s objection and submit the revised rule to the Commission.

Submit a written response to the Commission indicating that the agency has decided not to change the rule.

Time Limit. — An agency that is not a board or commission must take one of the actions listed in subsection (a) of this section within 30 days after receiving the Commission’s statement of objection. A board or commission must take one of these actions within 30 days after receiving the Commission’s statement of objection or within 10 days after the board or commission’s next regularly scheduled meeting, whichever comes later.

Changes. — When an agency changes a rule in response to an objection by the Commission, the Commission must determine whether the change satisfies the Commission’s objection. If it does, the Commission must approve the rule. If it does not, the Commission must send the agency a written statement of the Commission’s continued objection and the reason for the continued objection. The Commission must also determine whether the change is substantial. In making this determination, the Commission shall use the standards set forth in G.S. 150B-21.2(g). If the change is substantial, the revised rule shall be published and reviewed in accordance with the procedure set forth in G.S. 150B-21.1(a3) and (b).

Return of Rule. — A rule to which the Commission has objected remains under review by the Commission until the agency that adopted the rule decides not to satisfy the Commission’s objection and makes a written request to the Commission to return the rule to the agency. When the Commission returns a rule to which it has objected, it must notify the Codifier of Rules of its action. If the rule that is returned would have increased or decreased expenditures or revenues of a unit of local government, the Commission must also notify the Governor of its action and must send a copy of the record of the Commission’s review of the rule to the Governor. The record of review consists of the rule, the Commission’s letter of objection to the rule, the agency’s written response to the Commission’s letter, and any other relevant documents before the Commission when it decided to object to the rule.Regulatory Reform

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1995, c. 415, s. 5; c. 507, s. 27.8(h), (y); 2003-229, s. 10; 2011-291, s. 2.60; 2011-398, s. 8.

§ 150B-21.13.
Procedure when Commission extends period for review of permanent rule.

When the Commission extends the period for review of a permanent rule, it must notify the agency that adopted the rule of the extension and the reason for the extension. After the Commission extends the period for review of a rule, it may call a public hearing on the rule. Within 70 days after extending the period for review of a rule, the Commission must decide whether to approve the rule, object to the rule, or call a public hearing on the rule.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1.

§ 150B-21.14.
Public hearing on a rule.

The Commission may call a public hearing on a rule when it extends the period for review of the rule. At the request of an agency, the Commission may call a public hearing on a rule that is not before it for review. Calling a public hearing on a rule not already before the Commission for review places the rule before the Commission for review. When the Commission decides to call a public hearing on a rule, it must publish notice of the public hearing in the North Carolina Register.

After a public hearing on a rule, the Commission must approve the rule or object to the rule in accordance with the standards and procedures in this Part. The Commission must make its decision of whether to approve or object to the rule within 70 days after the public hearing.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1.

§ 150B-21.15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(i), effective December 1, 1995.

§ 150B-21.16.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 9, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to rules adopted on or after that date.

History.

1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(j); 2011-291, s. 2.61; repealed by 2011-398, s. 9, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to rules adopted on or after that date.

§ 150B-21.17.
North Carolina Register.

Content. — The Codifier of Rules must publish the North Carolina Register. The North Carolina Register must be published at least two times a month and must contain the following:

Temporary rules entered in the North Carolina Administrative Code.

(1a)

The text of proposed rules and the text of permanent rules approved by the Commission.

(1b)

Emergency rules entered into the North Carolina Administrative Code.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 10, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to rules adopted on or after that date

Executive orders of the Governor.

Final decision letters from the United States Attorney General concerning changes in laws that affect voting in a jurisdiction subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as required by G.S. 120-30.9H.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-330, s. 33(c), effective June 27, 2011, and by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 10, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to rules adopted on or after that date.

Other information the Codifier determines to be helpful to the public.

Form. — When an agency publishes notice in the North Carolina Register of the proposed text of a new rule, the Codifier of Rules must publish the complete text of the proposed new rule. In publishing the text of a proposed new rule, the Codifier must indicate the rule is new by underlining the proposed text of the rule.When an agency publishes notice in the North Carolina Register of the proposed text of an amendment to an existing rule, the Codifier must publish the complete text of the rule that is being amended unless the Codifier determines that publication of the complete text of the rule being amended is not necessary to enable the reader to understand the proposed amendment. In publishing the text of a proposed amendment to a rule, the Codifier must indicate deleted text with overstrikes and added text with underlines.When an agency publishes notice in the North Carolina Register of the proposed repeal of an existing rule, the Codifier must publish the complete text of the rule the agency proposes to repeal unless the Codifier determines that publication of the complete text is impractical. In publishing the text of a rule the agency proposes to repeal, the Codifier must indicate the rule is to be repealed.

The Codifier may authorize and license the private indexing, marketing, sales, reproduction, and distribution of the Register.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(k); 2001-141, s. 6; 2001-421, s. 1.4; 2003-229, s. 11; 2006-66, s. 18.1; 2011-330, s. 33(c); 2011-398, s. 10.

§ 150B-21.18.
North Carolina Administrative Code.

The Codifier of Rules must compile all rules into a Code known as the North Carolina Administrative Code. The format and indexing of the Code must conform as nearly as practical to the format and indexing of the North Carolina General Statutes. The Codifier must publish printed copies of the Code and may publish the Code in other forms. The Codifier may authorize and license the private indexing, marketing, sales, reproduction, and distribution of the Code. The Codifier must keep superseded rules.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1979, c. 69, ss. 3, 7; c. 541, s. 2; c. 688, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1266, ss. 1-3; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1359, s. 6; 1983, c. 641, s. 6; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1003, s. 2; c. 1022, s. 1(1), (19); c. 1032, s. 12; 1987, c. 774, ss. 2-4; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1111, s. 3; 1989, c. 500, s. 43(a); 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, s. 2; 2011-398, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-398, s. 11, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to rules adopted on or after that date, deleted the former fourth sentence, which read: “The Codifier must keep the Code current by publishing the Code in a loose-leaf format and periodically providing new pages to be substituted for outdated pages, by publishing the Code in volumes and periodically publishing cumulative supplements, or by another means.”

§ 150B-21.19.
Requirements for including rule in Code.

To be acceptable for inclusion in the North Carolina Administrative Code, a rule must:

Cite the law under which the rule is adopted.

Be signed by the head of the agency or the rule-making coordinator for the agency that adopted the rule.

Be in the physical form specified by the Codifier of Rules.

Have been approved by the Commission, if the rule is a permanent rule.

Have complied with the provisions of

G.S. 12-3.1

, if the rule establishes a new fee or increases an existing fee.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1979, c. 571, s. 1; 1981, c. 688, s. 14; 1983, c. 927, ss. 6, 9; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(1); c. 1028, s. 35; 1987, c. 285, s. 16; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(l); 2002-97, s. 4.

§ 150B-21.20.
Codifier’s authority to revise rules.

Authority. — After consulting with the agency that adopted the rule, the Codifier of Rules may revise a rule to do one or more of the following:

Rearrange the order of the rule in the Code or the order of the subsections, subdivisions, or other subparts of the rule.

Provide a catch line or heading for the rule or revise the catch line or heading of the rule.

Reletter or renumber the rule or the subparts of the rule in accordance with a uniform system.

Rearrange definitions and lists.

Make other changes in arrangement or in form that do not change the substance of the rule and are necessary or desirable for a clear and orderly arrangement of the rule.

Omit from the published rule a map, a diagram, an illustration, a chart, or other graphic material, if the Codifier of Rules determines that the Office of Administrative Hearings does not have the capability to publish the material or that publication of the material is not practicable. When the Codifier of Rules omits graphic material from the published rule, the Codifier must insert a reference to the omitted material and information on how to obtain a copy of the omitted material.

Substitute one name for another when an organization or position is renamed.

Correct a citation in the rule to another rule or law when the citation has become inaccurate since the rule was adopted because of the repeal or renumbering of the cited rule or law.

Change information that is readily available to the public, such as an address, email address, a telephone number, or a Web site.

Correct a typographical error.

Effect. — Revision of a rule by the Codifier of Rules under this section does not affect the effective date of the rule or require the agency to readopt or resubmit the rule. When the Codifier of Rules revises the form of a rule, the Codifier of Rules must send the agency that adopted the rule a copy of the revised rule. The revised rule is the official rule, unless the rule was revised under subdivision (a)(6) of this section to omit graphic material. When a rule is revised under that subdivision, the official rule is the published text of the rule plus the graphic material that was not published.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1979, c. 571, s. 1; 1981, c. 688, s. 14; 1983, c. 927, ss. 6, 9; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(1); c. 1028, s. 35; 1987, c. 285, s. 16; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1111, s. 23; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1997-34, s. 6; 2013-143, s. 3; 2019-140, s. 1(b).

§ 150B-21.21.
Publication of rules of North Carolina State Bar, Building Code Council, and exempt agencies.

State Bar. — The North Carolina State Bar must submit a rule adopted or approved by it and entered in the minutes of the North Carolina Supreme Court to the Codifier of Rules for inclusion in the North Carolina Administrative Code. The State Bar must submit a rule within 30 days after it is entered in the minutes of the Supreme Court. The Codifier of Rules must compile, make available for public inspection, and publish a rule included in the North Carolina Administrative Code under this subsection in the same manner as other rules in the Code.

(a1)

Building Code Council. —

The Building Code Council shall publish the North Carolina State Building Code as provided in G.S. 143-138(g). The Codifier of Rules is not required to publish the North Carolina State Building Code in the North Carolina Administrative Code.

Exempt Agencies. — Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an agency that is exempted from this Article by

G.S. 150B-1

or any other statute must submit a temporary or permanent rule adopted by it to the Codifier of Rules for inclusion in the North Carolina Administrative Code. These exempt agencies must submit a rule to the Codifier of Rules within 30 days after adopting the rule.

Publication. — A rule submitted to the Codifier of Rules under this section must be in the physical form specified by the Codifier of Rules. The Codifier of Rules must compile, make available for public inspection, and publish a rule submitted under this section in the same manner as other rules in the North Carolina Administrative Code.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1997-34, s. 7; 2001-141, s. 7; 2011-398, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-398, s. 12, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to rules adopted on or after that date, rewrote subsection (b).

§ 150B-21.22.
Effect of inclusion in Code.

Official or judicial notice can be taken of a rule in the North Carolina Administrative Code and shall be taken when appropriate.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1997-34, s. 8.

§ 150B-21.23.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 13, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to rules adopted on or after that date.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1979, c. 571, s. 1; 1981, c. 688, s. 14; 1983, c. 927, ss. 6, 9; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(1); c. 1028, s. 35; 1987, c. 285, s. 16; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1997-34, s. 9; repealed by 2011-398, s. 13, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to rules adopted on or after that date.

§ 150B-21.24.
Access to Register and Code.

Register. — The Codifier of Rules shall make available the North Carolina Register on the Internet at no charge.

Code. — The Codifier of Rules shall make available the North Carolina Administrative Code on the Internet at no charge.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; c. 69, ss. 3, 7; c. 688, s. 1; 1979, c. 541, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1266, ss. 1-3; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1359, s. 6; 1983, c. 641, s. 6; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1003, s. 2; c. 1022, s. 1(1), (19); c. 1032, s. 12; 1987, c. 774, ss. 2-4; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1111, s. 3; 1989, c. 500, s. 43(a); 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 2002-97, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 24.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 24.1, effective July 1, 2011, deleted the former last sentence of subsection (a), which read: “Upon request the Codifier shall provide a free copy of the current volume of the Register to any person who receives a free copy of the North Carolina Administrative Code or any member of the General Assembly”; deleted the former last sentence of subsection (b), which read: “The Codifier shall distribute copies of the North Carolina Administrative Code as soon after publication as practical, without charge, to the following”; and deleted subdivisions (b)(1) through (b)(9), which were the destinations of the aforementioned copies of the North Carolina Administrative Code.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “A Powerless Judiciary? The North Carolina Courts’ Perceptions of Review of Administrative Action,” see 12 N.C. Cent. L.J. 21 (1980).

§ 150B-21.25.
Paid copies of Register and Code.

A person who is not entitled to a free copy of the North Carolina Administrative Code or North Carolina Register may obtain a copy by paying a fee set by the Codifier of Rules. The Codifier must set separate fees for the North Carolina Register and the North Carolina Administrative Code in amounts that cover publication, copying, and mailing costs. All monies received under this section must be credited to the General Fund.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1.

Part 5. Rules Affecting Local Governments.

§ 150B-21.26.
Office of State Budget and Management to conduct preliminary review of certain administrative rules.

Preliminary Review. — At least 60 days before an agency publishes in the North Carolina Register the proposed text of a permanent rule change that would affect the expenditures or revenues of a unit of local government, the agency must submit all of the following to the Office of State Budget and Management for preliminary review:

The text of the proposed rule change.

A short explanation of the reason for the proposed change.

A fiscal note stating the amount by which the proposed rule change would increase or decrease expenditures or revenues of a unit of local government and explaining how the amount was computed.

Scope. — The preliminary review of a proposed permanent rule change that would affect the expenditures or revenues of a unit of local government shall include consideration of the following:

The agency’s explanation of the reason for the proposed change.

Any unanticipated effects of the proposed change on local government budgets.

The potential costs of the proposed change weighed against the potential risks to the public of not taking the proposed change.

History.

1995, c. 415, s. 3; c. 507, s. 27.8(w); 2011-398, s. 14.

§ 150B-21.27.
Minimizing the effects of rules on local budgets.

In adopting permanent rules that would increase or decrease the expenditures or revenues of a unit of local government, the agency shall consider the timing for implementation of the proposed rule as part of the preparation of the fiscal note required by G.S. 150B-21.4(b). If the computation of costs in a fiscal note indicates that the proposed rule change will disrupt the budget process as set out in the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act, Article 3 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, the agency shall specify the effective date of the change as July 1 following the date the change would otherwise become effective under

G.S. 150B-21.3

.

History.

1995, c. 415, s. 3; c. 507, s. 27.8(x).

§ 150B-21.28.
Role of the Office of State Budget and Management.

The Office of State Budget and Management shall:

Compile an annual summary of the projected fiscal impact on units of local government of State administrative rules adopted during the preceding fiscal year.

Compile from information provided by each agency schedules of anticipated rule actions for the upcoming fiscal year.

Provide the Governor, the General Assembly, the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, and the North Carolina League of Municipalities with a copy of the annual summary and schedules by no later than March 1 of each year.

History.

1995, c. 415, s. 3; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b).